Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1754.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 301(d) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 301. Definitions.--Any reference in this article to the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 shall mean the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.), as amended to January 1, 1997, unless the reference contains the phrase "as amended" and refers to no other date, in which case the reference shall be to the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as 12345678910111213141516171819202122 it exists as of the time of application of this article. The following words, terms and phrases when used in this article shall have the meaning ascribed to them in this section except where the context clearly indicates a different meaning:* * *(d) "Compensation" means and shall include salaries, wages, commissions, bonuses and incentive payments whether based on profits or otherwise, fees, tips and similar remuneration received for services rendered, whether directly or through an agent, and whether in cash or in property. The term "compensation" shall include any part of a distribution under a plan described in section 409A(d)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 409A(d)(1)), as amended, attributable to an elective deferral of income or the income on any elective deferral of income, whether paid or payable during employment or to a retired person upon or after retirement from service.The term "compensation" shall not mean or include: (i) periodic payments for sickness and disability other than regular wages received during a period of sickness or disability; or (ii) disability, retirement or other payments arising under workmen's compensation acts, occupational disease acts and similar legislation by any government; or (iii) payments commonly recognized as old age or retirement benefits paid to persons retired from service after reaching a specific age or after a stated period of employment; or (iv) payments commonly known as public assistance, including the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, the Women, Infants, and Children program, the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program and the Children's Health Insurance Program, or payments commonly known 20250HB1754PN2161 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 as social safety net benefits, including Pell Grants, Head Start and Medicaid waiver payments, or unemployment compensation payments by any governmental agency; or (v) payments to reimburse actual expenses; or (vi) payments made by employers or labor unions, including payments made pursuant to a cafeteria plan qualifying under section 125 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 125), for employe benefit programs covering hospitalization, sickness, disability or death, supplemental unemployment benefits or strike benefits: Provided, That the program does not discriminate in favor of highly compensated individuals as to eligibility to participate, payments or program benefits; or (vii) any compensation received by United States servicemen serving in a combat zone; or (viii) payments received by a foster parent for in-home care of foster children from an agency of the Commonwealth or a political subdivision thereof or an organization exempt from Federal tax under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 which is licensed by the Commonwealth or a political subdivision thereof as a placement agency; or (ix) payments made by employers or labor unions for employe benefit programs covering social security or retirement; or (x) personal use of an employer's owned or leased property or of employer-provided services.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1754PN2161 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425